Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1042.01
Natural hair braiding, defined.

(1) Natural hair braiding means the twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding of hair by hand or with mechanical devices such as clips, combs, crochet hooks, curlers, curling irons, hairpins, rollers, scissors, blunt-tipped needles, thread, and hair binders.

(2) Natural hair braiding includes (a) the use of natural or synthetic hair extensions, natural or synthetic hair fibers, decorative beads, and other hair accessories, (b) minor trimming of natural hair or hair extensions incidental to twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding hair, (c) the use of topical agents, such as conditioners, gels, moisturizers, oils, pomades, and shampoos, in conjunction with hair braiding, and (d) the making of wigs from natural hair, natural fibers, synthetic fibers, and hair extensions.

(3) Natural hair braiding does not include (a) the application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other preparations to alter the color of hair or to straighten, curl, or alter the structure of hair or (b) the use of chemical hair joining agents such as synthetic tape, keratin bonds, or fusion bonds.

Laws 2016, LB898, § 3.